ro-RO: Mecanism al legăturii de schi: Alpin; Hibrid de tură alpin; Backcountry (NNN BC/Xplore); Schi fond clasic; Schi fond skate (patinaj); Tură cu cadru; Placă (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Cablu Telemark 75 mm; Telemark NTN; Alpin tineret/juniori; Altul
pl: Mechanizm wiązań narciarskich: Zjazdowe; Skitourowe hybrydowe; Backcountry (NNN BC/Xplore); Biegowe klasyczne; Biegowe łyżwowe; Skitourowe szynowe; Płytowe (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pinowe; Telemarkowe 75 mm z kablem; Telemarkowe NTN; Młodzieżowe/juniorskie zjazdowe; Inne
nl: Skibinding mechanisme: Alpine; Alpine touring hybride; Backcountry (NNN BC/Xplore); Langlauf klassiek; Langlauf skate; Frame touring; Plaat (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm kabel; Telemark NTN; Jeugd/junior alpine; Overig
hu: Síkötés mechanizmusa: Alpesi; Alpesi túra hibrid; Túrasí (NNN BC/Xplore); Sífutó (klasszikus); Sífutó (korcsolyázó); Keretes túra; Lemezes (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm-es kábeles; Telemark NTN; Ifjúsági/junior alpesi; Egyéb
ru: Механизм лыжного крепления: Горнолыжные; Горнолыжные гибридные (ски-тур); Бэккантри (NNN BC/Xplore); Беговые классические; Беговые коньковые; Рамные (ски-тур); Платформа (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Пиновые (Tech); Телемарк (75 мм с тросом); Телемарк (NTN); Подростковые/юниорские горнолыжные; Другое
zh-TW: 滑雪板固定器機制: 高山滑雪; 高山旅行滑雪混合; 野外滑雪 (NNN BC/Xplore); 傳統越野滑雪; 自由式越野滑雪; 框架式旅行滑雪; 墊板式 (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); 科技/插銷式; 泰勒馬克 75 毫米纜繩; 泰勒馬克 NTN; 青少年/兒童高山滑雪; 其他
sl-SI: Mehanizem smučarskih vezi: Alpsko; Alpsko turno hibridno; Backcountry (NNN BC/Xplore); Tek na smučeh (klasična tehnika); Tek na smučeh (drsalna tehnika); Turno z okvirjem; Plošča (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin (na zatiče); Telemark 75 mm s kablom; Telemark NTN; Mladinsko/otroško alpsko; Drugo
fr: Mécanisme de la fixation des skis: Alpin; Hybride de randonnée alpine; Hors-piste (NNN BC/Xplore); Ski de fond classique; Ski de fond style libre; Randonnée à plaques; Plaque (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/à inserts; Télémark câble 75 mm; Télémark NTN; Alpin enfant/junior; Autre
es: Mecanismo de fijación de esquís: Alpino; Alpino de travesía híbrido; Backcountry (NNN BC/Xplore); Esquí de fondo clásico; Esquí de fondo patinador; Fijación de marco para travesía; Placa (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Cable Telemark 75 mm; Telemark NTN; Alpino juvenil/infantil; Otro
zh-CN: 滑雪固定器机制: 高山滑雪; 高山越野混合; 野外越野 (NNN BC/Xplore); 传统式越野; 自由式越野; 框架式越野; 底板 (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); 技术/销钉式; 泰勒马克 75 毫米缆索; 泰勒马克 NTN; 青少年高山滑雪; 其他
de: Mechanismus der Skibindung: Alpin; Tourenski-Hybrid; Backcountry (NNN BC/Xplore); Langlauf Classic; Langlauf Skating; Rahmenbindung (Tourenski); Platte (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm Kabel; Telemark NTN; Kinder/Jugend Alpin; Andere
ko: 스키 바인딩 방식: 알파인; 알파인 투어링 하이브리드; 백컨트리(NNN BC/Xplore); 크로스컨트리 클래식; 크로스컨트리 스케이트; 프레임 투어링; 플레이트(NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); 테크/핀; 텔레마크 75mm 케이블; 텔레마크 NTN; 청소년/주니어 알파인; 기타
ja: スキービンディングメカニズム: アルペン; アルパンツーリングハイブリッド; バックカントリー (NNN BC/Xplore); クロスカントリークラシック; クロスカントリースケート; フレームツーリング; プレート (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); テック/ピン; テレマーク75mmケーブル; テレマークNTN; ユース/ジュニアアルペン; その他
cs: Mechanismus vázání lyží: Sjezdové; Skialpinistické hybridní; Backcountry (NNN BC / Xplore); Běžkařské klasické; Běžkařské bruslařské; Skialpinistické rámové; Deska (NNN / Prolink / Turnamic); Pinové; Telemarkové 75mm (s lankem); Telemarkové NTN; Dětské/juniorské sjezdové; Jiný
tr: Kayak bağlama mekanizması: Alp disiplini; Alp disiplini tur hibrit; Dağlık bölge (NNN BC/Xplore); Kros klasik; Kros serbest; Çerçeve tur; Plaka (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm kablolu; Telemark NTN; Genç/Yıldız Alp disiplini; Diğer
pt-BR: Fixação de esqui mecanismo: Alpino; Touring alpino híbrido; Backcountry (NNN BC/Xplore); Cross-country clássico; Cross-country skate; Touring frame; Placa (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/pino; Telemark de cabo 75 mm; Telemark NTN; Alpino juvenil/infantil; Outro
nb: Skibindingsmekanisme: Alpint; Alpint topptur hybrid; Fjellski (NNN BC/Xplore); Langrenn klassisk; Langrenn skøyting; Rammebinding topptur; Plate (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/pin; Telemark 75 mm kabel; Telemark NTN; Ungdom/junior alpint; Annet
it: Meccanismo di aggancio sci: Alpino; Sci alpinismo ibrido; Backcountry (NNN BC/Xplore); Sci di fondo classico; Sci di fondo skating; Sci alpinismo con telaio; Piastra (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm a cavo; Telemark NTN; Alpino per ragazzi/junior; Altro
en: Ski binding mechanism: Alpine; Alpine Touring Hybrid; Backcountry (NNN BC/Xplore); Cross-country Classic; Cross-country Skate; Frame Touring; Plate (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm Cable; Telemark NTN; Youth/Junior Alpine; Other
vi: Cơ chế gắn ván trượt: Alpine; Alpine Touring Hybrid; Trượt tuyết địa hình (NNN BC/Xplore); Trượt tuyết băng đồng cổ điển; Trượt tuyết băng đồng tự do; Khung Touring; Đế gắn (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Cáp Telemark 75 mm; Telemark NTN; Alpine cho thanh thiếu niên/trẻ em; Khác
el: Μηχανισμός δέστρας σκι: Αλπικό; Υβριδικό αλπικό touring; Backcountry (NNN BC/Xplore); Κλασικό cross-country; Cross-country skate; Frame Touring; Plate (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Telemark καλώδιο 75 mm; Telemark NTN; Παιδικό/Εφηβικό αλπικό; Άλλο
pt-PT: Mecanismo de fixação de esquis: Alpino; Alpino de travessia híbrido; Fora de pista (NNN BC/Xplore); Esqui de fundo clássico; Esqui de fundo estilo livre; Touring de armação; Placa (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Cabo Telemark 75 mm; Telemark NTN; Alpino juvenil/júnior; Outro
sk-SK: Mechanizmus viazania lyží: Zjazdové; Skialpinistické hybridné; Backcountry (NNN BC/Xplore); Bežecké klasické; Bežecké skejtové; Rámové skialpinistické; Doska (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Telemarkové 75 mm lankové; Telemarkové NTN; Detské/juniorské zjazdové; Iné
sv: Skidbindningsmekanism: Alpint; Alpin touring hybrid; Turskidor (NNN BC/Xplore); Längdskidåkning klassisk; Längdskidåkning skate; Rambindning för touring; Platta (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm kabel; Telemark NTN; Ungdom/junior alpint; Övrigt
lt-LT: Slidžių apkaustų mechanizmas: Kalnų slidžių; Hibridiniai kalnų turistinių slidžių; Bekelės („NNN BC“ / „Xplore“); Klasikinių lygumų slidžių; Laisvo stiliaus lygumų slidžių; Rėminiai turistinių slidžių; Plokšteliniai („NNN“ / „Prolink“ / „Turnamic“); Smeigtukiniai („Tech/Pin“); Telemarko 75 mm trosiniai; Telemarko NTN; Jaunimo / jaunių kalnų slidžių; Kita
th: กลไกการยึดสกี: อัลไพน์; อัลไพน์ทัวร์ริงไฮบริด; แบ็กคันทรี (NNN BC/Xplore); ครอสคันทรีแบบคลาสสิก; ครอสคันทรีแบบสเกต; เฟรมทัวร์ริง; เพลต (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); เทค/พิน; เทเลมาร์ก สายเคเบิล 75 มม.; เทเลมาร์ก NTN; อัลไพน์สำหรับเด็ก/เยาวชน; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Механизъм на ски автоматите: Алпийски; Алпийски туринг (хибриден); Беккънтри (NNN BC/Xplore); Ски бягане (класически стил); Ски бягане (свободен стил); Рамков туринг; На пластина (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin (щифтов); Телемарк 75 мм с кабел; Телемарк NTN; Детски/Юношески алпийски; Друг
fi: Suksien sidemekanismi: Alppi; Alppivaellus hybridi; Retkihiihto (NNN BC / Xplore); Maastohiihto perinteinen; Maastohiihto luistelu; Runkoside; Levy (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm kaapeli; Telemark NTN; Nuoret/juniorit alppi; Muu
hr-HR: Mehanizam za vezivanje skija: Alpski; Hibridni alpski turni; Backcountry (NNN BC/Xplore); Klasično trčanje na skijama; Slobodni stil trčanja na skijama (skate); Turni s okvirom; Ploča (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech / Pin; Telemark 75 mm kabel; Telemark NTN; Alpski za mlade/juniore; Ostalo
da: Skibindingsmekanisme: Alpint; Alpine Touring Hybrid; Backcountry (NNN BC/Xplore); Klassisk langrend; Skøjtelangrend; Frame Touring; Plade (NNN/Prolink/Turnamic); Tech/Pin; Telemark 75 mm-kabel; Telemark NTN; Ungdom/Junior Alpint; Andet